Utah statutes.
58-40a-102.   Definitions.

In addition to the definitions in Section 58-1-102, as used in this chapter:

(1) "Adequate records" means legible records that contain, at a minimum:

(a)  the athletic training service plan or protocol;

(b)  an evaluation of objective findings;

(c)  the plan of care and the treatment records; or

(d)  written orders.

(2)  "Athlete" means an individual, referee, coach, or athletic staff member who participates in exercises, sports, or games requiring physical strength, agility, flexibility, range of motion, speed, or stamina, and the exercises, sports, or games are of a type generally conducted in association with an educational institution or professional, amateur, or recreational sports club or organization.

(3)  "Athletic injury" means:

(a)  an injury sustained by an athlete that affects the individual's participation or performance in sports, games, recreation, or exercise; or

(b)  a condition that is within the scope of practice of an athletic trainer identified by a directing physician or physical therapist as benefitting from athletic training services.

(4)  "Athletic trainer" means an individual who is licensed under this chapter and carries out the practice of athletic training.

(5)  "Board" means the Athletic Trainers Licensing Board created in Section 58-40a-201.

(6)  "Directing physician" means a physician and surgeon licensed under Section 58-67-301, an osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under Section 58-68-301, a chiropractic physician licensed under Chapter 73, Chiropractic Physician Practice Act, a naturopathic physician licensed under Chapter 71, Naturopathic Physician Practice Act, or dentist licensed under Section 58-69-301 who, within the licensee's scope of practice and individual competency, is responsible for the athletic training services provided by the athletic trainer and oversees the practice of athletic training by the athletic trainer, as established by board rule.

(7)  The "practice of athletic training" means the application by a licensed and certified athletic trainer of principles and methods of:

(a)  prevention of athletic injuries;

(b)  recognition, evaluation, and assessment of athletic injuries and conditions;

(c)  immediate care of athletic injuries, including common emergency medical situations;

(d)  rehabilitation and reconditioning of athletic injuries;

(e)  athletic training services administration and organization; and

(f)  education of athletes.



Enacted by Chapter 206, 2006 General Session

